Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.180

Contributions on behalf of another. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A person, other than an individual, may not be an intermediary or an agent for a contribution.

(2) An individual may not make a contribution on behalf of another person or entity, or while acting as the intermediary or agent of another person or entity, without disclosing to the recipient of the contribution both his or her full name, street address, occupation, name of employer, if any, or place of business if self-employed, and the same information for each contributor for whom the individual serves as intermediary or agent.

[ 2024 c 164 s 460; 1993 c 2 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.470, 42.17.730.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.